Mississippi, session 2026, HB1012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Arborist Registration Law of 2026." SECTION 2.  As used in this act the following words and phrases shall include the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly requires a different meaning: (a)  "Person" means a natural person. (b) "Arborist" means an individual or professional entity engaged in the commercial practice of the cultivation, management and study of trees, shrubs and other woody plants, who is qualified to engage in the practice of arboriculture and who also has been duly registered and holds a current valid license issued by the board. (c)  "Registered arborist" means a person who has been registered and licensed pursuant to this act. (d) "Arboriculture" means: (i)  Pruning, trimming, and shaping trees, especially when the work requires leaving the ground; (ii)  Diagnosing and treating tree conditions, such as diseases or pest infestations; (iii)  Installing cabling, bracing or lightning protection systems; (iv)  Felling or removing trees in developed areas; and (v)  Providing consultation, tree appraisals and expert legal testimony. (e)  "Board" means the State Board of Registration for Arborists established under Section 5 of this act. (f) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce. (g) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce. SECTION 3. (1)  In order to benefit and protect the public, no person in either public or private capacity shall practice or offer to practice arboriculture, unless he or she shall first have submitted evidence that he or she is qualified so to practice and shall be registered by the State Board of Registration for Arborists or unless he or she is specifically exempted from registration under this act.  It is unlawful for any person to practice or offer to practice arboriculture in this state, as defined by this act, or to use in connection with his or her name or otherwise assume, use or advertise any title or description tending to convey the impression that he or she is an arborist, unless the person has been duly registered or is exempt from registration under this act. (2)  This act shall not be construed to prevent or to affect: (a)  The conduct of business and support services including: (i)  Tree cutting; (ii)  Tree trunk removal; (iii)  Stump grinding; (iv)  Pruning, trimming and shaping trees; (v)  Diagnosing and treating tree conditions resulting from diseases or pest infestations; (vi)  Installation of cabling, bracing or lightning protection systems; (vii)  Felling or removing trees in developed areas; and (viii)  Providing consultation, appraisals and expert legal testimony; (b)  The application of arboriculture principles and procedures on any lands in which the person, firm, partnership or corporation owns; or persons, firms, partnerships and corporations having the right to manage and administer lands in any legal manner; (c)  The work of an employee or a subordinate of any arborist holding a license if that work is done under the direction, supervision and responsibility of a person holding a license under this act; (d)  The practice of arboriculture by officers and employees of the United States government on federally­-owned lands; (e)  The practice of arboriculture by officers and employees of the State of Mississippi on state-owned lands; or (f)  Employees of the federal government, state government and educational institutions of the State of Mississippi who, in the exercise of their assigned duties, conduct arboriculture education programs. SECTION 4. Nothing contained in this act shall be construed as preventing any person, firm, partnership or corporation from practicing arboriculture on any land, provided such acts are not performed or offered to the public for compensation, unless otherwise exempted in Section 3 of this act. SECTION 5. (1) There is hereby created the State Board of Registration for Arborists of the State of Mississippi for the purposes of safeguarding, through regulation, the practice of arboriculture and requiring that persons practicing or offering to practice arboriculture to be registered.  The board shall be composed of six (6) members appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate, as follows: (a)  Two (2) of whom shall be commercial arborists or arborist who have been engaged in practice as arborists or arborists for five (5) years; (b)  One (1) of whom shall be an entomologist; (c)  One (1) of whom shall be a plant pathologist; (d)  One (1) of whom shall be a representative of a state or municipal forestry or parks department; and (e)  The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce, who shall serve as an ex officio member of the board. (2)  The Governor shall appoint members to the board by August 1, 2026, designating an initial term of office of one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4) or five (5) years for each of the members as appointed.  As the terms of office of the members so appointed expire, successors shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years.  Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the board shall be filled by the Governor for the unexpired term.  The Governor shall have the right, upon the approval of a majority of the board, to remove any members of the board for inefficiency, neglect of duty or dishonorable conduct. (3)  No person shall be appointed a member of the board unless the person at the time appointed has held a license in his or her field of expertise for at least five (5) years. (4)  Each year the board shall elect one (1) of its members as chairman, one (1) as vice chairman, and one (1) as secretary, and each shall perform the usual duties of such offices.  The board may adopt an official seal.  Three (3) members of the board shall constitute a quorum, and a majority vote of those present at any meeting shall be necessary for the adoption of any order proposed or the disposition of other business coming before the board. (5)  The board shall hold at least two (2) regular meetings during each year and such other meetings as the chairman may find necessary.  Notice of the time and place of the meetings of the board shall be mailed to each of the members of the board at least five (5) days before the meeting and, in addition, shall be posted as provided by the rules and regulations of the board at least five (5) days prior to the meeting. (6)  (a)  Each member of the board shall receive per diem compensation as authorized by Section 25-3-69, and shall be reimbursed for such other expenses at the same rate and under the same conditions as provided for public officers and employees in Section 25-3-41. The department shall pay for all expenses incurred by the board, including clerical help as may be needed, if itemized statements of the expenses are first approved by order of the board entered on its minutes.  The department shall not expend in any fiscal year more monies on the board's behalf than the amount of fees collected. (b)  All fees shall be paid to the department and the commissioner shall deposit all monies received under this act in the State Treasury.  All such monies shall be kept in a special fund in the State Treasury known as the "State Board of Registered Arborists Fund" and shall be used for the administration of this act.  The funds shall not lapse at the end of each year. (c)  All expenditures from the fund shall be by requisition to the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration and signed by the board chairman.  The secretary of the board shall be under a surety bond in the penal sum of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) with a surety company authorized to do business in this state, the bond to be conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties, and the fee shall be paid by the board. SECTION 6. (1)  The State Board of Registration for Arborists shall have the following powers and duties: (a)  To adopt rules and regulations governing the holding of its meetings, hearings, applications for licenses and any and all other duties provided by this act; (b)  To establish and promulgate standards of practice and a code of ethics for registered arborists and provide for the enforcement thereof; (c)  To establish minimum requirements for professional continuing education; (d)  To prepare a biennial roster showing the names, business addresses and such other information as the board may deem necessary of all arborists registered under this act, and to provide copies to the registered arborists and the public.  A copy of the roster shall be filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Mississippi on or before April 1 in the year such roster is prepared; and (e)  To issue, suspend or revoke licenses and to take all actions necessary. (2)  At any hearing before the board, any member may administer oaths to witnesses appearing before the board.  If any person shall refuse to testify or to produce any books, papers or documents, the board may present its petition to any court of competent jurisdiction within the state setting forth the facts, and then the court, in a proper case, may issue its subpoena to the person requiring his or her attendance before the court and to testify or to produce such books, papers and documents as may be deemed necessary and pertinent thereto.  Any person failing or refusing to obey the subpoena of the court may be proceeded against in the same manner as for refusal to obey any other subpoena of the court. (3)  The board shall keep a record of its proceedings and a register of all applications for registration. The register shall show the name, age and residence of each applicant, the date of the application and the board's action on the application and any other information as may be deemed necessary by the board.  The board shall submit an annual report to the Governor and a report to the regular session of the Legislature.  The report to the Legislature shall include a financial statement of the transactions of the board during the year. SECTION 7. (1)  Every person applying to the board for licensure must do so in writing on forms prescribed and furnished by the board and pay a required nonrefundable fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).  An applicant must indicate if the license is sought for an individual or an entity.  The application shall include without limitation the name, principal place of business, address, telephone number of the applicant, and shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. (2)  (a)  Licensure may be granted in an individual's name to an individual applicant who meets all of the following qualifications: (i)  He or she must be at least twenty-one (21) years of age; (ii)  He or she must be a citizen of the United States; (iii)  He or she must hold a current certification from the International Society of Arboriculture or hold an associate or bachelor's degree from an accredited postsecondary educational institution approved by the board, in the fields of forestry, horticulture or plant science; and (iv)  He or she must meet all other requirements deemed necessary by the board. (b)  Licensure may be granted in an entity's name to an entity applicant that meets all of the following qualifications: (i)  The entity must designate a qualifying party who: 1.  Possesses a valid individual license under this act; 2.  Is legally qualified to act for the entity in all matters connected with the practice of the arboriculture profession; and 3.  Is directly responsible for contracts or the provision of diagnostic services; and (ii)  The entity must be in compliance with any statutory requirements pertaining to such legal entity. (3)  No individual licensee may engage in the practices of a arborist as an employee or officer or serve as a qualifying party of more than one (1) entity licensee during any one (1) period of time. (4)  (a)  All applicants for licensure under this act must provide the board with proof of compliance with the applicable regulations set forth by the Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA), the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) and the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service (APHIS), along with proof that the applicant has obtained Workers' Compensation insurance covering the applicant's employees or is approved as a self-insurer of Workers' Compensation in accordance with Mississippi law. (b)  Any applicant who engages in the application of pesticides as it relates to the practice of the arboriculture profession must provide proof to the board of possessing a valid applicator license issued by the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce under the Mississippi Pesticide Law, as prescribed in Section 69-23-101, et seq. (5)  The board may establish further requirements for licensure by rule.  The board may review and investigate the denial of any license, upon appeal by the denied applicant, and the board may issue a license to an applicant who met the requirements for such license at the time of application. SECTION 8. (1)  Each nonresident applicant for an original license or a renewal license, except a foreign corporation, shall file an irrevocable consent that actions against the applicant may be filed in any appropriate court of any county or municipality of this state in which the plaintiff resides or in which some part of the transaction occurred, out of which the alleged cause of action arose and that process in any action may be served on the applicant by leaving two (2) copies of the process with the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce.  Such consent shall stipulate and agree that service of process shall be taken and held to be valid and binding for all purposes.  The commissioner shall send one (1) copy of the process to the applicant at the nonresident licensee's address of record by registered mail. (2)  No foreign corporation shall receive a license under this act until it has been authorized to do business in this state by the board. SECTION 9. When written examinations are required, they shall be held at such time and place as the board shall determine.  The methods of procedure shall be prescribed by the board.  A candidate failing an examination may apply for reexamination at the expiration of six (6) months and shall be entitled to one (1) reexamination without payment of an additional fee.  Subsequent examinations may be granted upon payment of a fee to be determined by the board, but not in excess of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). SECTION 10.  The board shall issue a properly authenticated, serially numbered license upon payment of the registration fee to any applicant who in the opinion of the board has satisfactorily met all the requirements of this act and the rules and regulations of the board duly adopted under this act.  The issuance of a license by the board shall be evidence that the person named therein is entitled to all the rights and privileges of a registered arborist while the license remains unrevoked or unexpired. SECTION 11. Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, all licenses issued under the provisions of this act shall expire after December 31 of odd numbered years and shall become invalid after that date unless renewed.  The secretary of the board shall mail a notice to every person registered under this act notifying the person of the date of the expiration of his license and the amount of fee required for its renewal for two (2) years.  The notice shall be mailed to the latest known address, according to the board's records, at least one (1) month in advance of the date of the expiration of the license.  The board shall from time to time fix the fee for renewal of licenses, provided the fee shall not exceed the amount of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for two (2) years' renewal. Any registrant failing to renew his license and applying for a license shall be required to pay a fee as set by the board not to exceed twice the total amount of the license fees had his license been continued in effect, and also to comply with such other reasonable requirements as may be established by rules and regulations of the board. SECTION 12. (1)  A person not a resident of and having no established place of business in Mississippi, or who has recently become a resident, may use the title of registered arborist in Mississippi, provided: (a)  The person is legally licensed as a registered arborist in his or her own state or county and has submitted evidence to the board that he or she is so licensed and that the requirements for registration are at least substantially equivalent to the requirements of this act; and (b)  The state or county in which he or she is so licensed observes these same rules of reciprocity in regard to persons licensed under this act. (2)  Each person seeking the privileges of reciprocity granted under this act shall submit his or her application to the board and must receive a card or certificate from the board before exercising such privileges.  The fee for obtaining a license through reciprocity shall be the same as charged a Mississippi licensee.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. SECTION 13. (1)  Every person licensed as an arborist shall have filed with the department a good and sufficient surety bond in the penal sum of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), with sufficient surety, signed by the arborist as principal and by a responsible company authorized to execute surety bonds within the State of Mississippi.  The bond shall be filed and recorded in the office of the clerk of the chancery court in which the arborist resides or wherein the principal place of business of the entity engaged in the profession of arboriculture is located, and shall be payable, conditioned and approved in the manner provided by law. (2)  The bond shall be in favor of the commissioner for the benefit of all persons interested, their legal representatives, attorneys or assigns, conditioned upon the faithful compliance by the arborist with the provisions of this act and the rules and regulations promulgated by the board and enforced by the Department of Agriculture and Commerce applicable thereto.  The aggregate liability of the surety shall not exceed the sum of such bond.  The bond may be cancelled at any time by the surety by giving written notice to the arborist and the commissioner of its intention to cancel the bond and all liability thereunder shall terminate sixty (60) days after the mailing of such notice except that such notice shall not affect any claims arising under the bond, whether presented or not, before the effective date of the cancellation notice. SECTION 14. (1)  The board shall have the power, after notice and hearing, to suspend or revoke the license of any registrant who: (a)  Is found guilty by the board of fraud or gross negligence in the practice of professional arboriculture; (b)  Fails to comply with board rules and regulations; (c)  Is found guilty by the board of unprofessional or unethical conduct; or (d)  Has had his or her license suspended or revoked for cause in another jurisdiction. (2)  Any person may prefer charges of fraud or gross negligence in connection with any forestry practice against any registrant.  Such charges shall be in writing, shall be sworn to by the person making them, and shall be filed with the secretary of the board. All charges shall be heard by the board pursuant to its rules and regulations without undue delay. (3)  Any applicant whose license is suspended or revoked by the board may apply for a review of the proceedings with reference to such suspension or revocation by appealing to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, provided a notice of appeal is filed by such applicant with the clerk of said court within sixty (60) days from entry of an order by the board suspending or revoking his or her license, provided said applicant files with said notice of appeal a bond to be approved by the court assuring the prompt payment of any and all costs of said appeal, said amount to be fixed by the court.  Upon the filing of such notice of appeal and posting of such bond, the clerk of the said court shall notify the secretary of the board thereof and the record of the proceedings involved shall be prepared by the secretary and forwarded to the court within a period of sixty (60) days from such notice by the clerk.  The court shall thereupon review the proceedings on the record presented and may hear such additional testimony that may appear material to the court, and dispose of the appeal in termtime or in vacation, and the court may sustain or dismiss the appeal, or modify or vacate the order complained of, but in case the order is modified or vacated, the court may also, in its discretion, remand the matter to the board for such further proceedings not inconsistent with the court's order as, in the opinion of the court, justice may require.  The decision of the chancery court may be appealed as other cases to the Supreme Court. (4)  The board is authorized to secure, by contract, the services of an investigator when deemed necessary by the board to properly consider any charge then before it.  The board may, at its discretion, establish a program of routine inspections. (5)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153, or for failure of the licensee to satisfy a judgment against such licensee, and/or the company or business for which the licensee provided services, provided that such judgement was rendered in connection to the practice of arboriculture.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this act, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 15. Any person who practices or offers to practice the profession of arboriculture in this state without being registered in accordance with this act, or any person who uses in connection with his or her name, or otherwise assumes, uses or advertises any title or description tending to convey the impression that he or she is a registered arborist without being registered in accordance with this act, or any person who presents or attempts to use as his or her own the license of another, or any person who gives any false or forged evidence of any kind to the board or any member in obtaining a license, or any person who attempts to use an expired or revoked license, or any person, firm, partnership or corporation who violates any of the provisions of this act and has not been issued an administrative fine by the board for the violation is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment in the county jail for a period not less than thirty (30) days, or both such fine and imprisonment, for each violation.  The board, or any person or persons as may be designated by the board to act in its stead, is empowered to prefer charges for any violations of this act in any court of competent jurisdiction.  It shall be the duty of all duly constituted officers of the law of this state to enforce the provisions of this act and to prosecute any persons, firms, partnerships or corporations violating same.  Except as otherwise authorized in Section 7-5-39, the Attorney General of the state or his or her designated assistant shall act as legal advisor of the board and render such assistance as may be necessary in carrying out the provisions of this act. SECTION 16. (1)  An action by a client to recover damages for any act or omission of a registered arborist relating to the performance of an arboricultural work detail or project shall be commenced within three (3) years after the date an arboricultural work detail or project is completed or the action shall be barred.  Further, a registered arborist shall not be liable for any latent defects that may be contained in the observable systems and components of improvements to residential or commercial real property wherein the arboricultural work detail or project was performed. (2)  Any professional who is licensed by the State of Mississippi when acting within the scope of his or her profession and is not a registered arborist shall not be liable for the findings, errors, or omissions of an arboricultural work detail or project, provided that he or she has not provided physical work on the work detail or project and has no personal or financial interest in the ownership of the residential or commercial real property. (3)  Any person who in good faith or intention recommends or endorses an arborist without compensation, remuneration, rebate, or any other form of consideration shall not be liable for the actions of that arborist, including errors, omissions, failure to perform any contracted duties of an arboricultural work detail or project, or failure to meet the standards of practice or code of ethics. SECTION 17. In addition to the penalties provided under Sections 14 and 15 of this act, any person, found by the board to be in violation of this act or any rule or regulation of the board, shall be subject to an administrative fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation.  The person shall be given at least ten (10) days' written notice and an opportunity for a hearing before the board.  If the administrative fine is not paid within ninety (90) days after the date of the board's order, the order shall become a judgment and may be filed and executed.  Any person aggrieved of the board's order may appeal the order to the Circuit Court of Hinds County within thirty (30) days after the date of the order of the board is issued.  Appeal shall be on the record made before the board. SECTION 18.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.